Virginia statutes. Title 43. Mechanics’ and Certain Other Liens.
Chapter 7. Miscellaneous Liens.

§ 43-62.
Lien for farm products consigned to commission merchant.

Whenever any farm products shall have been consigned to any commission merchant for sale, and he shall have made sale thereof and become insolvent or die before paying over the proceeds of the sale thereof to, or on account of, the consignor or owner of the farm products, the claim of such consignor or owner, when legally proved, shall be a lien on the estate of the commission merchant subject only to such liens as were created on the estate and recorded prior to his insolvency or death.

The benefit of this section shall not accrue to any consignor or owner who, without requesting payment, shall allow such proceeds to remain with such commission merchant at interest, nor to any consignor or owner who, without requesting payment, shall allow such proceeds to remain in the hands of such commission merchant more than 30 days after becoming informed of such sale.

Jurisdiction is hereby given to circuit courts to enforce the provisions of this section.

History.

Code 1919, § 6448; 2005, c. 681.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 681, effective January 1, 2006, substituted “to circuit courts” for “to courts exercising circuit court powers in chancery” in the last paragraph and made a minor stylistic change.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 99, 100.

§ 43-63.
Lien for cleaning, laundering, dyeing, pressing or storing clothing, rugs and other fabrics.

Every person, firm, association and corporation engaged in the business of cleaning, laundering, dyeing and pressing or storing clothing, carpets, rugs and other fabrics shall have a lien upon such clothing, carpets, rugs or other fabrics for the amount which may be due for the cleaning, dyeing, pressing or storage thereof, and may retain such clothing, carpets, rugs or other fabrics until such amount is paid.

If the debt for which a lien is given under this section be not paid within ninety days after it is due, the property subject to such lien, or so much thereof as may be necessary to satisfy such lien, may be sold by the person, firm, association or corporation holding such lien at public auction for cash, and the proceeds of such sale applied to the expenses thereof, and to pay the debt, and the surplus, if any, shall be paid to the owner of such property. Before making such sale the person, firm or corporation holding such lien shall give ten days’ written notice thereof by registered mail sent to the last known post-office address of such owner, and, in addition thereto, shall advertise the time and place thereof in such manner as to give it reasonable publicity; provided that if the owner at the time of leaving such property to be cleaned, laundered, dyed, pressed or stored is given a ticket or other receipt therefor which bears on its face in type not smaller than eight point the words, “The property evidenced hereby may be sold if unclaimed after one hundred and eighty days except in the case of stored property which shall not be subject to sale until such property is unclaimed for two hundred forty days,” then notice of sale by mail and other advertisement shall not be required. A copy of this section shall be prominently displayed in the place of business in which any such property is left by the owner.

History.

1938, p. 613; Michie Code 1942, § 6451a; 1964, c. 272; 1973, c. 317.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 97.

§ 43-63.1.
Repealed by Acts 2003, c. 455.

Cross references.

For current provisions regarding lien against ambulance service for negligence, see §§

8.01-66.2

et seq.